dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX d4 Y 105
SFX d4 er er/n'q'd'l'm't's' er
SFX d4 er ant/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX d4 er e/q' er
SFX d4 eter ette/n'q'j'l'm't' jeter
SFX d4 eter ette/n'q'j'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler elle/n'q'j'l'm't' ppeler
SFX d4 eler elle/n'q'j'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter ettes/n'q'l'm't' jeter
SFX d4 eter ettes/n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler elles/n'q'l'm't' ppeler
SFX d4 eler elles/n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter ette/n'q'l'm't's' jeter
SFX d4 eter ette/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler elle/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler
SFX d4 eler elle/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d4 er ons/n'q'l't' er
SFX d4 er ez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX d4 eter ettent/n'q'l'm't's' jeter
SFX d4 eter ettent/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler ellent/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler
SFX d4 eler ellent/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d4 er ais/n'q'j'l'm't' er
SFX d4 er ais/n'q'l'm't' er
SFX d4 er ait/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX d4 er ions/n'q'l't' er
SFX d4 er iez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX d4 er aient/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX d4 er ai/n'q'j'l'm't' er
SFX d4 er as/n'q'l'm't' er
SFX d4 er a/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX d4 er ames/n'q'l't' er
SFX d4 er ates/n'q'l'm' er
SFX d4 er erent/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX d4 eter etterai/n'q'j'l'm't' jeter
SFX d4 eter etterai/n'q'j'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler ellerai/n'q'j'l'm't' ppeler
SFX d4 eler ellerai/n'q'j'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter etteras/n'q'l'm't' jeter
SFX d4 eter etteras/n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler elleras/n'q'l'm't' ppeler
SFX d4 eler elleras/n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter ettera/n'q'l'm't's' jeter
SFX d4 eter ettera/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler ellera/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler
SFX d4 eler ellera/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter etterons/n'q'l't' jeter
SFX d4 eter etterons/n'q'l't' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler ellerons/n'q'l't' ppeler
SFX d4 eler ellerons/n'q'l't' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter etterez/n'q'l'm' jeter
SFX d4 eter etterez/n'q'l'm' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler ellerez/n'q'l'm' ppeler
SFX d4 eler ellerez/n'q'l'm' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter etteront/n'q'l'm't's' jeter
SFX d4 eter etteront/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler elleront/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler
SFX d4 eler elleront/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter etterais/n'q'j'l'm't' jeter
SFX d4 eter etterais/n'q'j'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler ellerais/n'q'j'l'm't' ppeler
SFX d4 eler ellerais/n'q'j'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter etterais/n'q'l'm't' jeter
SFX d4 eter etterais/n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler ellerais/n'q'l'm't' ppeler
SFX d4 eler ellerais/n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter etterait/n'q'l'm't's' jeter
SFX d4 eter etterait/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler ellerait/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler
SFX d4 eler ellerait/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter etterions/n'q'l't' jeter
SFX d4 eter etterions/n'q'l't' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler ellerions/n'q'l't' ppeler
SFX d4 eler ellerions/n'q'l't' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter etteriez/n'q'l'm' jeter
SFX d4 eter etteriez/n'q'l'm' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler elleriez/n'q'l'm' ppeler
SFX d4 eler elleriez/n'q'l'm' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter etteraient/n'q'l'm't's' jeter
SFX d4 eter etteraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler elleraient/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler
SFX d4 eler elleraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter ette/n'j'l'm't' jeter
SFX d4 eter ette/n'j'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler elle/n'j'l'm't' ppeler
SFX d4 eler elle/n'j'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter ettes/n'l'm't' jeter
SFX d4 eter ettes/n'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler elles/n'l'm't' ppeler
SFX d4 eler elles/n'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d4 eter ette/n'l'm't's' jeter
SFX d4 eter ette/n'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler elle/n'l'm't's' ppeler
SFX d4 eler elle/n'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d4 er ions/n'l't' er
SFX d4 er iez/n'l'm' er
SFX d4 eter ettent/n'l'm't's' jeter
SFX d4 eter ettent/n'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d4 eler ellent/n'l'm't's' ppeler
SFX d4 eler ellent/n'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d4 er asse/n'q'j'l'm't' er
SFX d4 er asses/n'q'l'm't' er
SFX d4 er at/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX d4 er assions/n'q'l't' er
SFX d4 er assiez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX d4 er assent/n'q'l'm't's' er

SFX d5 Y 105
SFX d5 er er/m'q'd'm't's' er
SFX d5 er ant/m'q'd'm't's' er
SFX d5 er e/q' er
SFX d5 eter ette/n'j'm't' jeter
SFX d5 eter ette/n'j'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elle/n'j'm't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elle/n'j'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter ettes/n'm't' jeter
SFX d5 eter ettes/n'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elles/n'm't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elles/n'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter ette/n'q'm't's' jeter
SFX d5 eter ette/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elle/n'q'm't's' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elle/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 er ons/n't' er
SFX d5 er ez/n'm' er
SFX d5 eter ettent/n'q'm't's' jeter
SFX d5 eter ettent/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellent/n'q'm't's' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellent/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 er ais/n'j'm't' er
SFX d5 er ais/n'm't' er
SFX d5 er ait/n'q'm't's' er
SFX d5 er ions/n't' er
SFX d5 er iez/n'm' er
SFX d5 er aient/n'q'm't's' er
SFX d5 er ai/n'j'm't' er
SFX d5 er as/n'm't' er
SFX d5 er a/n'q'm't's' er
SFX d5 er ames/n't' er
SFX d5 er ates/n'm' er
SFX d5 er erent/n'q'm't's' er
SFX d5 eter etterai/n'j'm't' jeter
SFX d5 eter etterai/n'j'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellerai/n'j'm't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellerai/n'j'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etteras/n'm't' jeter
SFX d5 eter etteras/n'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elleras/n'm't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elleras/n'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter ettera/n'q'm't's' jeter
SFX d5 eter ettera/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellera/n'q'm't's' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellera/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etterons/n't' jeter
SFX d5 eter etterons/n't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellerons/n't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellerons/n't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etterez/n'm' jeter
SFX d5 eter etterez/n'm' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellerez/n'm' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellerez/n'm' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etteront/n'q'm't's' jeter
SFX d5 eter etteront/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elleront/n'q'm't's' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elleront/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etterais/n'j'm't' jeter
SFX d5 eter etterais/n'j'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellerais/n'j'm't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellerais/n'j'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etterais/n'm't' jeter
SFX d5 eter etterais/n'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellerais/n'm't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellerais/n'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etterait/n'q'm't's' jeter
SFX d5 eter etterait/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellerait/n'q'm't's' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellerait/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etterions/n't' jeter
SFX d5 eter etterions/n't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellerions/n't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellerions/n't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etteriez/n'm' jeter
SFX d5 eter etteriez/n'm' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elleriez/n'm' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elleriez/n'm' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etteraient/n'q'm't's' jeter
SFX d5 eter etteraient/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elleraient/n'q'm't's' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elleraient/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter ette/n'j'm't' jeter
SFX d5 eter ette/n'j'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elle/n'j'm't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elle/n'j'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter ettes/n'm't' jeter
SFX d5 eter ettes/n'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elles/n'm't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elles/n'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter ette/n'q'm't's' jeter
SFX d5 eter ette/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elle/n'q'm't's' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elle/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 er ions/n't' er
SFX d5 er iez/n'm' er
SFX d5 eter ettent/n'q'm't's' jeter
SFX d5 eter ettent/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellent/n'q'm't's' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellent/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 er asse/n'j'm't' er
SFX d5 er asses/n'm't' er
SFX d5 er at/n'q'm't's' er
SFX d5 er assions/n't' er
SFX d5 er assiez/n'm' er
SFX d5 er assent/n'q'm't's' er

SFX a+ Y 3
SFX a+ er es/q' er
SFX a+ er ee/q' er
SFX a+ er ees/q' er
