dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.dic
abraser/a4a+()
accidenter/a2a+()
accoutrer/a4a+()
acheter/b4a+()
adjectiviser/a2a+()
adulterer/c2a+()
affleurer/a2a+()
affubler/a4a+()
agricher/a2a+()
ajouter/a4a+()
allegoriser/a2a+()
ambifier/a3a+()
amonceler/d4a+()
amordancer/a2a+()
anglaiser/a2a+()
anonymiser/a4a+()
apostropher/a4a+()
appeler/d4a+()
apprivoiser/a4a+()
ardoiser/a2a+()
arracher/a4a+()
asperger/a4a+()
assoiffer/a2a+()
atteler/d4a+()
attester/a2a+()
auner/a2a+()
autosuggestionner/a3a+()
avorter/a2a+()
bagarrer/a0a+()
balkaniser/a0a+()
baratter/a0a+()
bastonner/a0a+()
benner/a0a+()
bidouiller/a0a+()
bistourner/a0a+()
bleuter/a0a+()
bonder/a0a+()
boucaner/a0a+()
boulotter/a0a+()
brailler/a0a+()
bresiller/a0a+()
briocher/a0a+()
bruiter/a0a+()
cabrer/a0a+()
caïmanter/a0a+()
calorifuger/a0a+()
cannibaliser/a0a+()
capturer/a0a+()
carier/a0a+()
caser/a0a+()
cavaler/a0a+()
cercler/a0a+()
champlever/b0a+()
charcuter/a0a+()
chausser/a0a+()
chimer/a0a+()
chouchouter/a0a+()
cintrer/a0a+()
claquer/a0a+()
cliver/a0a+()
coder/a0a+()
collectiviser/a0a+()
commemorer/a0a+()
compisser/a0a+()
computer/a0a+()
conditionner/a0a+()
congeler/b0a+()
considerer/c0a+()
contagionner/a0a+()
contrarier/a0a+()
contre-profiler/a0a+()
convulser/a0a+()
corner/a0a+()
coucher/a0a+()
courtauder/a0a+()
craqueler/d0a+()
crevasser/a0a+()
croûter/a0a+()
curer/a0a+()
danser/a0a+()
debaptiser/a0a+()
debloquer/a0a+()
debourser/a0a+()
debudgetiser/a0a+()
decalquer/a0a+()
decaver/a0a+()
dechausser/a0a+()
declarer/a0a+()
decoloniser/a0a+()
deconseiller/a0a+()
decramponner/a0a+()
decruser/a0a+()
defalquer/a0a+()
deficher/a0a+()
defragmenter/a0a+()
degasoliner/a0a+()
degonder/a0a+()
degriser/a0a+()
dejanter/a0a+()
delayer/a0a+()
delover/a0a+()
demarcher/a0a+()
demerger/a0a+()
demoucheter/d0a+()
denebuler/a0a+()
denoter/a0a+()
deparasiter/a0a+()
depenaliser/a0a+()
deplanquer/a0a+()
deporter/a0a+()
depuceler/d0a+()
dereguler/a0a+()
desaccoutumer/a0a+()
desaliener/c0a+()
desarchiver/a0a+()
desembobiner/a0a+()
desencrasser/a0a+()
desenrouer/a0a+()
desesperer/c0a+()
designer/a0a+()
desinteresser/a0a+()
desordonner/a0a+()
dessiller/a0a+()
detacher/a0a+()
detortiller/a0a+()
devaliser/a0a+()
devirer/a0a+()
dialectaliser/a0a+()
digerer/c0a+()
discompter/a0a+()
disqualifier/a0a+()
divulguer/a0a+()
doucher/a0a+()
droper/a0a+()
ebouer/a2a+()
ecailler/a4a+()
echauffer/a4a+()
echeler/d4a+()
ecloper/a2a+()
ecolleter/d4a+()
ecouvillonner/a2a+()
edicter/a2a+()
efflanquer/a4a+()
egrainer/a4a+()
electriser/a2a+()
emailler/a2a+()
embaucher/a4a+()
embourber/a4a+()
embratteler/d4a+()
embrouiller/a4a+()
emmanteler/d4a+()
emmarger/a2a+()
emoucheter/d2a+()
empaumer/a2a+()
emplâtrer/a2a+()
emulsifier/a2a+()
encastrer/a4a+()
encirer/a2a+()
encrer/a2a+()
endurer/a2a+()
enfourcher/a2a+()
engober/a2a+()
engrumeler/d4a+()
enherber/a2a+()
enlier/a2a+()
enresiner/a2a+()
enseigner/a4a+()
entartrer/a4a+()
entraver/a2a+()
enumerer/c2a+()
epancher/a4a+()
epeler/d4a+()
epiler/a4a+()
epouser/a4a+()
erayer/a2a+()
escompter/a2a+()
essayer/a4a+()
estrapasser/a2a+()
eteter/a2a+()
eveiller/a4a+()
exhaler/a4a+()
externaliser/a2a+()
farter/a0a+()
feuiller/a0a+()
flageller/a0a+()
fonder/a0a+()
fragiliser/a0a+()
freter/c0a+()
fritter/a0a+()
gameler/d0a+()
gerer/c0a+()
goudronner/a0a+()
greffer/a0a+()
gueuler/a0a+()
haricoter/a0a+()
homogeneiser/a2a+()
hypnotiser/a4a+()
implementer/a2a+()
indenter/a2a+()
initier/a4a+()
intensifier/a4a+()
invectiver/a2a+()
javeler/d0a+()
lâcher/a0a+()
lemmatiser/a0a+()
linger/a0a+()
lyncher/a0a+()
maltraiter/a0a+()
marcotter/a0a+()
materialiser/a0a+()
menager/a0a+()
mijoter/a0a+()
molester/a0a+()
mouiller/a0a+()
nager/a0a+()
nitrurer/a0a+()
occasionner/a2a+()
organiser/a4a+()
pager/a0a+()
papouiller/a0a+()
passementer/a0a+()
pelleter/d0a+()
pervibrer/a0a+()
pimer/a0a+()
platiner/a0a+()
polycopier/a0a+()
pousser/a0a+()
preparer/a0a+()
procurer/a0a+()
provigner/a0a+()
queuter/a0a+()
radiner/a0a+()
ramender/a0a+()
râteler/d0a+()
reajuster/a0a+()
recadrer/a0a+()
recoler/a0a+()
recreuser/a0a+()
reecouter/a0a+()
refouler/a0a+()
rehausser/a0a+()
relater/a0a+()
rembourser/a0a+()
rempoter/a0a+()
renquiller/a0a+()
repercer/a0a+()
repudier/a0a+()
ressuer/a0a+()
retribuer/a0a+()
revoquer/a0a+()
roneotyper/a0a+()
saccader/a0a+()
satelliser/a0a+()
scorifier/a0a+()
serialiser/a0a+()
slaviser/a0a+()
soufrer/a0a+()
specifier/a0a+()
striduler/a0a+()
suggestionner/a0a+()
surcreuser/a0a+()
suroxyder/a0a+()
tabouiser/a0a+()
tartiner/a0a+()
tenonner/a0a+()
tiser/a0a+()
touer/a0a+()
translater/a0a+()
tricoter/a0a+()
tuber/a0a+()
valider/a0a+()
verjuter/a0a+()
visiter/a0a+()
zerver/a0a+()
